Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0800.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 13j. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 325 to 332 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 328.232 Property E Conversion of funeral contracts 5 330.1944 Pub saf F Criminal sexual psychopath leaving state without permission 4 330.3213(4) Pub saf E Facility that receives or maintains an adult who requires residential psychiatric care without a license 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 799 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.